src/Korektor/sr-Latn.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1557 Y 28
SFX 1557 psti psti
SFX 1557 psti bem
SFX 1557 psti beš
SFX 1557 psti be
SFX 1557 psti bemo
SFX 1557 psti bete
SFX 1557 psti be
SFX 1557 psti beo
SFX 1557 psti bela
SFX 1557 psti belo
SFX 1557 psti beli
SFX 1557 psti bele
SFX 1557 psti beću
SFX 1557 psti bećeš
SFX 1557 psti beće
SFX 1557 psti bećemo
SFX 1557 psti bećete
SFX 1557 psti beće
SFX 1557 psti bi
SFX 1557 psti bimo
SFX 1557 psti bite
SFX 1557 psti beh
SFX 1557 psti be
SFX 1557 psti beše
SFX 1557 psti besmo
SFX 1557 psti beste
SFX 1557 psti bljahu
SFX 1557 psti beći

SFX 1558 Y 36
SFX 1558 hati hati
SFX 1558 hati ham
SFX 1558 hati haš
SFX 1558 hati ha
SFX 1558 hati hamo
SFX 1558 hati hate
SFX 1558 hati haju
SFX 1558 hati šem
SFX 1558 hati šeš
SFX 1558 hati še
SFX 1558 hati šemo
SFX 1558 hati šete
SFX 1558 hati haju
SFX 1558 hati hao
SFX 1558 hati hala
SFX 1558 hati halo
SFX 1558 hati hali
SFX 1558 hati hale
SFX 1558 hati haću
SFX 1558 hati haćeš
SFX 1558 hati haće
SFX 1558 hati haćemo
SFX 1558 hati haćete
SFX 1558 hati haće
SFX 1558 hati haj
SFX 1558 hati hajmo
SFX 1558 hati hajte
SFX 1558 hati ši
SFX 1558 hati šimo
SFX 1558 hati šite
SFX 1558 hati hah
SFX 1558 hati haše
SFX 1558 hati hasmo
SFX 1558 hati haste
SFX 1558 hati hahu
SFX 1558 hati hajući

SFX 1559 Y 28
SFX 1559 sati sati
SFX 1559 sati šem
SFX 1559 sati šeš
SFX 1559 sati še
SFX 1559 sati šemo
SFX 1559 sati šete
SFX 1559 sati šu
SFX 1559 sati sao
SFX 1559 sati sala
SFX 1559 sati salo
SFX 1559 sati sali
SFX 1559 sati sale
SFX 1559 sati saću
SFX 1559 sati saćeš
SFX 1559 sati saće
SFX 1559 sati saćemo
SFX 1559 sati saćete
SFX 1559 sati saće
SFX 1559 sati ši
SFX 1559 sati šimo
SFX 1559 sati šite
SFX 1559 sati sah
SFX 1559 sati saše
SFX 1559 sati sasmo
SFX 1559 sati saste
SFX 1559 sati sahu
SFX 1559 sati šući
SFX 1559 sati savši

SFX 1560 Y 27
SFX 1560 kati kati
SFX 1560 kati ćem
SFX 1560 kati ćeš
SFX 1560 kati će
SFX 1560 kati ćemo
SFX 1560 kati ćete
SFX 1560 kati ću
SFX 1560 kati kao
SFX 1560 kati kala
SFX 1560 kati kalo
SFX 1560 kati kali
SFX 1560 kati kale
SFX 1560 kati kaću
SFX 1560 kati kaćeš
SFX 1560 kati kaće
SFX 1560 kati kaćemo
SFX 1560 kati kaćete
SFX 1560 kati kaće
SFX 1560 kati ći
SFX 1560 kati ćimo
SFX 1560 kati ćite
SFX 1560 kati kah
SFX 1560 kati kaše
SFX 1560 kati kasmo
SFX 1560 kati kaste
SFX 1560 kati kahu
SFX 1560 kati ćući

SFX 1561 Y 27
SFX 1561 eti eti
SFX 1561 eti anjem
SFX 1561 eti anješ
SFX 1561 eti anje
SFX 1561 eti anjemo
SFX 1561 eti anjete
SFX 1561 eti anju
SFX 1561 eti eo
SFX 1561 eti ela
SFX 1561 eti elo
SFX 1561 eti eli
SFX 1561 eti ele
SFX 1561 eti eću
SFX 1561 eti ećeš
SFX 1561 eti eće
SFX 1561 eti ećemo
SFX 1561 eti ećete
SFX 1561 eti eće
SFX 1561 eti nji
SFX 1561 eti njimo
SFX 1561 eti njite
SFX 1561 eti eh
SFX 1561 eti eše
SFX 1561 eti esmo
SFX 1561 eti este
SFX 1561 eti njahu
SFX 1561 eti eći

SFX 1562 Y 28
SFX 1562 ći ći
SFX 1562 ći žem
SFX 1562 ći žeš
SFX 1562 ći že
SFX 1562 ći žemo
SFX 1562 ći žete
SFX 1562 ći žu
SFX 1562 ći gao
SFX 1562 ći gla
SFX 1562 ći glo
SFX 1562 ći gli
SFX 1562 ći gle
SFX 1562 ći gnuću
SFX 1562 ći gnućeš
SFX 1562 ći gnuće
SFX 1562 ći gnućemo
SFX 1562 ći gnućete
SFX 1562 ći gnuće
SFX 1562 ći gni
SFX 1562 ći gnimo
SFX 1562 ći gnite
SFX 1562 ći goh
SFX 1562 ći že
SFX 1562 ći goše
SFX 1562 ći gosmo
SFX 1562 ći goste
SFX 1562 ći gohu
SFX 1562 ći ći

SFX 1563 Y 36
SFX 1563 kati kati
SFX 1563 kati čem
SFX 1563 kati češ
SFX 1563 kati če
SFX 1563 kati čemo
SFX 1563 kati čete
SFX 1563 kati ču
SFX 1563 kati kam
SFX 1563 kati kaš
SFX 1563 kati ka
SFX 1563 kati kamo
SFX 1563 kati kate
SFX 1563 kati kaju
SFX 1563 kati kao
SFX 1563 kati kala
SFX 1563 kati kalo
SFX 1563 kati kali
SFX 1563 kati kale
SFX 1563 kati kaću
SFX 1563 kati kaćeš
SFX 1563 kati kaće
SFX 1563 kati kaćemo
SFX 1563 kati kaćete
SFX 1563 kati kaće
SFX 1563 kati či
SFX 1563 kati čimo
SFX 1563 kati čite
SFX 1563 kati kaj
SFX 1563 kati kajmo
SFX 1563 kati kajte
SFX 1563 kati kah
SFX 1563 kati kaše
SFX 1563 kati kasmo
SFX 1563 kati kaste
SFX 1563 kati kahu
SFX 1563 kati čući

SFX 1564 Y 36
SFX 1564 njeti njeti
SFX 1564 njeti njem
SFX 1564 njeti nješ
SFX 1564 njeti nje
SFX 1564 njeti njemo
SFX 1564 njeti njete
SFX 1564 njeti nju
SFX 1564 njeti anjem
SFX 1564 njeti anješ
SFX 1564 njeti anje
SFX 1564 njeti anjemo
SFX 1564 njeti anjete
SFX 1564 njeti anju
SFX 1564 njeti nio
SFX 1564 njeti njela
SFX 1564 njeti njelo
SFX 1564 njeti njeli
SFX 1564 njeti njele
SFX 1564 njeti njeću
SFX 1564 njeti njećeš
SFX 1564 njeti njeće
SFX 1564 njeti njećemo
SFX 1564 njeti njećete
SFX 1564 njeti njeće
SFX 1564 njeti nji
SFX 1564 njeti njimo
SFX 1564 njeti njite
SFX 1564 njeti anji
SFX 1564 njeti anjimo
SFX 1564 njeti anjite
SFX 1564 njeti njeh
SFX 1564 njeti nješe
SFX 1564 njeti njesmo
SFX 1564 njeti njeste
SFX 1564 njeti njahu
SFX 1564 njeti anjući

SFX 1565 Y 27
SFX 1565 teti teti
SFX 1565 teti tim
SFX 1565 teti tiš
SFX 1565 teti ti
SFX 1565 teti timo
SFX 1565 teti tite
SFX 1565 teti te
SFX 1565 teti teo
SFX 1565 teti tela
SFX 1565 teti telo
SFX 1565 teti teli
SFX 1565 teti tele
SFX 1565 teti teću
SFX 1565 teti tećeš
SFX 1565 teti teće
SFX 1565 teti tećemo
SFX 1565 teti tećete
SFX 1565 teti teće
SFX 1565 teti ti
SFX 1565 teti timo
SFX 1565 teti tite
SFX 1565 teti teh
SFX 1565 teti teše
SFX 1565 teti tesmo
SFX 1565 teti teste
SFX 1565 teti ćahu
SFX 1565 teti teći

SFX 1566 Y 29
SFX 1566 nuti nuti
SFX 1566 nuti nem
SFX 1566 nuti neš
SFX 1566 nuti ne
SFX 1566 nuti nemo
SFX 1566 nuti nete
SFX 1566 nuti nu
SFX 1566 nuti nuo
SFX 1566 nuti nula
SFX 1566 nuti nulo
SFX 1566 nuti nuli
SFX 1566 nuti nule
SFX 1566 nuti nuću
SFX 1566 nuti nućeš
SFX 1566 nuti nuće
SFX 1566 nuti nućemo
SFX 1566 nuti nućete
SFX 1566 nuti nuće
SFX 1566 nuti ni
SFX 1566 nuti nimo
SFX 1566 nuti nite
SFX 1566 nuti nuh
SFX 1566 nuti nu
SFX 1566 nuti nuše
SFX 1566 nuti nusmo
SFX 1566 nuti nuste
SFX 1566 nuti njahu
SFX 1566 nuti neći
SFX 1566 nuti nuvši

SFX 1567 Y 28
SFX 1567 sneti sneti
SFX 1567 sneti snim
SFX 1567 sneti sniš
SFX 1567 sneti sni
SFX 1567 sneti snimo
SFX 1567 sneti snite
SFX 1567 sneti sne
SFX 1567 sneti sneo
SFX 1567 sneti snela
SFX 1567 sneti snelo
SFX 1567 sneti sneli
SFX 1567 sneti snele
SFX 1567 sneti sneću
SFX 1567 sneti snećeš
SFX 1567 sneti sneće
SFX 1567 sneti snećemo
SFX 1567 sneti snećete
SFX 1567 sneti sneće
SFX 1567 sneti sni
SFX 1567 sneti snimo
SFX 1567 sneti snite
SFX 1567 sneti sneh
SFX 1567 sneti sne
SFX 1567 sneti sneše
SFX 1567 sneti snesmo
SFX 1567 sneti sneste
SFX 1567 sneti šnjahu
SFX 1567 sneti snevši

SFX 1568 Y 28
SFX 1568 snjeti snjeti
SFX 1568 snjeti snim
SFX 1568 snjeti sniš
SFX 1568 snjeti sni
SFX 1568 snjeti snimo
SFX 1568 snjeti snite
SFX 1568 snjeti sne
SFX 1568 snjeti snio
SFX 1568 snjeti snjela
SFX 1568 snjeti snjelo
SFX 1568 snjeti snjeli
SFX 1568 snjeti snjele
SFX 1568 snjeti snjeću
SFX 1568 snjeti snjećeš
SFX 1568 snjeti snjeće
SFX 1568 snjeti snjećemo
SFX 1568 snjeti snjećete
SFX 1568 snjeti snjeće
SFX 1568 snjeti sni
SFX 1568 snjeti snimo
SFX 1568 snjeti snite
SFX 1568 snjeti snjeh
SFX 1568 snjeti snje
SFX 1568 snjeti snješe
SFX 1568 snjeti snjesmo
SFX 1568 snjeti snjeste
SFX 1568 snjeti šnjahu
SFX 1568 snjeti snjevši

SFX 1569 Y 28
SFX 1569 ati ati
SFX 1569 ati im
SFX 1569 ati iš
SFX 1569 ati i
SFX 1569 ati imo
SFX 1569 ati ite
SFX 1569 ati i
SFX 1569 ati ao
SFX 1569 ati ala
SFX 1569 ati alo
SFX 1569 ati ali
SFX 1569 ati ale
SFX 1569 ati aću
SFX 1569 ati aćeš
SFX 1569 ati aće
SFX 1569 ati aćemo
SFX 1569 ati aćete
SFX 1569 ati aće
SFX 1569 ati i
SFX 1569 ati imo
SFX 1569 ati ite
SFX 1569 ati ah
SFX 1569 ati a
SFX 1569 ati aše
SFX 1569 ati asmo
SFX 1569 ati aste
SFX 1569 ati ahu
SFX 1569 ati avši
