src/Korektor/sr-Latn.dic
dupsti/1557
duhati/1558
ejakulisati/1559
žvakati/1560
žeti/1561
žeći/1562
žmikati/1563
žnjeti/1564
žuteti/1565
žutnuti/1566
zabesneti/1567
zabjesnjeti/1568
zablejati/1569
zviždukati/1560
zrikati/1563
izbesneti/1567
izbjesnjeti/1568
izblejati/1569
leteti/1565
obliterisati/1559
pobesneti/1567
pobijesneti/1567
pobjesneti/1567
pobjesnjeti/1568
problejati/1569
puhati/1558
razbesneti/1567
razbjesneti/1567
razbjesnjeti/1568
tikati/1563
ćuteti/1565
uzbesneti/1567
uzbjesnjeti/1568
šuteti/1565
